Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1849XS (5) 91 th/ns S.F. 375 Section 1. Section 321.1, subsection 36A, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 âLow-speed electric bicycleâ means a device having equipped 3 with a saddle or seat for the use of a rider, two or three 4 wheels , equipped with fully operable pedals, and an electric 5 motor of less than that produces not more than seven hundred 6 fifty watts that meets , and is classified in accordance with 7 the following requirements of one of the following classes : 8 Sec. 2. Section 321.1, subsection 51A, Code 2025, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 51A. âPedestrian conveyanceâ means any human-powered device 11 by which a pedestrian may move other than by walking or by 12 which a pedestrian may move another person, including but not 13 limited to a wheelchair, stroller, skateboard, scooter, or 14 other similar device. âPedestrian conveyanceâ also includes 15 an electric personal assistive mobility device and any other 16 device used to move a person sitting or standing on the device 17 regardless of whether the device is powered by an electric 18 motor, so long as the electric motor produces less not more 19 than seven hundred fifty watts. âPedestrian conveyanceâ does 20 not include a bicycle. 21